Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.193.070

Education site closures or reduction in services—Notice to the superintendent of public instruction and education providers—Liability for failure to provide notice—Alternative dispute resolution.

By April 15th of each school year, the department of corrections shall provide written notice to the superintendent of public instruction and education providers operating programs under this chapter of any reasonably foreseeable education site closures, reductions in the number of inmates or education services, or any other cause for a reduction in certificated or classified staff the next school year. In the event the department of corrections fails to provide notice as required by this section, the department is liable and responsible for the payment of the salary and employment-related costs for the next school year of each employee whose contract would or could have been nonrenewed but for the failure of the department to provide notice. Disputes arising under this section shall be resolved in accordance with the alternative dispute resolution method or methods specified in the contract required by RCW 28A.193.060.

[ 1998 c 244 s 8.]